Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.395

Opioid overdose reversal medication—Policy guidelines and treatment requirements—Grant program.

(1) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Opioid overdose reversal medication" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.41.095; and

(b) "Opioid-related overdose" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.41.095.

(2)(a) To prevent opioid-related overdoses and respond to medical emergencies resulting from overdoses, by January 1, 2020, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of health and the Washington state school directors' association, shall develop opioid-related overdose policy guidelines and training requirements for public schools and school districts.

(b)(i) The opioid-related overdose policy guidelines and training requirements must include information about: The identification of opioid-related overdose symptoms; how to obtain and maintain opioid overdose reversal medication on school property issued through a standing order in accordance with RCW 28A.210.390; how to obtain opioid overdose reversal medication through donation sources; the distribution and administration of opioid overdose reversal medication by designated trained school personnel; free online training resources that meet the training requirements in this section; and sample standing orders for opioid overdose reversal medication.

(ii) The opioid-related overdose policy guidelines may: Include recommendations for the storage and labeling of opioid overdose reversal medications that are based on input from relevant health agencies or experts; and allow for opioid-related overdose reversal medications to be obtained, maintained, distributed, and administered by health care professionals and trained staff located at a health care clinic on public school property or under contract with the school district.

(c) In addition to being offered by the school, training on the distribution or administration of opioid overdose reversal medication that meets the requirements of this subsection (2) may be offered by nonprofit organizations, higher education institutions, and local public health organizations.

(3)(a) By September 1, 2024, the Washington state school directors' association must collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of health to either update existing model policy or develop a new model policy that meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(b) School districts must adopt an opioid-related overdose policy in accordance with RCW 28A.210.390.

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington state school directors' association must maintain the model policy and procedure on each agency's website at no cost to school districts.

(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and administer a grant program to provide funding to public schools and public higher education institutions to purchase opioid overdose reversal medication and train personnel on the administration of opioid overdose reversal medication to respond to symptoms of an opioid-related overdose. The office must publish on its website a list of annual grant recipients, including award amounts.

[ 2024 c 214 s 2; 2019 c 314 s 40.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.